indra/newview/app_settings/dictionaries/da_dk.dic
udsmidning/70,73,7,976
udsagn/70,252,10,976,939,947
udrangere/6,143,148
udpantning/70,73,7,976
udløser/20,7,70,976
udenrigsudvalg/70,252,10,976
tv-portræt/70,9,976
tromle/6,143,148,941,947
trivi/70,73,7,976
tribut/46,70,976
travhest/20,7,70,976
transferbeløb/70,252,10,976
torden/70,73,7,976,941,947
tital/70,9,976,941,947
terrakotta/70,976
termin/70,73,7,976,939,947
telefoto/70,10,73,976
telefontråd/20,7,70,976
tekste/6,143,148
tegnebræt/70,9,976
tat/46,70,976
talsystem/70,10,73,976
synsbedrag/70,252,10,976
syfilitiker/20,7,70,976
sydspids/70,73,7,976
sunnit/46,70,976
stretchstof/70,9,976
strege/6,143,148
storskjorte/70,73,7,976
storhæler/20,7,70,976
storhjerne/70,73,7,976
stencil/70,73,7,976
statistik/46,70,976
spritapparat/70,10,73,976
spildsamler/20,7,70,976
sommerpensionat/70,10,73,976
snøresko/70,7,252,976
snære/6,143,148
smæk/46,70,976,941,947
smuthul/70,9,976
sliplet/207,70,366,976
skraldergrine/6,143,148
skibsmandskab/70,10,73,976
skarpskytte/70,73,7,976
sjippetov/10,70,20,976
silhuet/46,70,976
sejlbræt/70,9,976
sammenhæng/20,7,70,976,939,947
sammenbøje/6,143,148
saltvandsfisk/70,7,252,976
saftpresse/70,73,7,976
ræk/46,70,976,941,947
rettelsesblad/10,70,20,976
retrospektiv/70,10,73,976
renfærdighed/70,73,7,976
rekruttere/6,143,148
realrenteskat/46,70,976
raritetskabinet/70,9,976
påstand/20,7,70,976
påholdenhed/193,70,976
præstere/6,143,148
projektkonkurrence/70,73,7,976
pilotere/6,143,148
pigmentkorn/70,252,10,976
pick-up/46,70,976
pentagram/70,9,976
pendling/70,73,7,976
peber/20,7,70,976,941,947
papir/70,10,73,976,941,947
pamper/20,7,70,976,941,947
overeksponere/6,143,148
opbremse/6,143,148
nærpunkt/70,10,73,976
nital/70,9,976
neutralitetspolitik/46,70,976
nervekrig/20,7,70,976
negligering/70,73,7,976
nedslidning/70,73,7,976
nedpløje/6,143,148
navneliste/70,73,7,976
nar/130,70,976,941,947
mindstemål/70,252,10,976
meningsmålingsinstitut/70,9,976
menage/70,73,7,976
mellemmad/46,70,976
medundertegne/6,143,148
mediepamper/20,7,70,976
meddelelseshemmelighed/70,73,7,976
mat/70,73,7,976
lune/70,10,73,976
limit/46,70,976
lilleput/46,70,976
letmetal/70,9,976
lejdebrev/10,70,20,976
landvæsenselev/70,73,7,976
kødklump/70,73,7,976
kvarter/70,10,73,976
krakelere/6,143,148
kradseri/70,10,73,976
korpus/70,9,976
korpus/46,70,976,941,947
kontaktur/10,70,20,976
kollegianer/20,7,70,976
klarsyn/70,252,10,976
kategori/70,73,7,976,941,947
kanonsalut/46,70,976
kammer/70,131,976,941,947
kaktusbrændevin/20,7,70,976
kabinet/70,9,976,939,947
isskraber/20,7,70,976
interferere/6,143,148
inspektion/70,73,7,976,939,947
indbegreb/70,10,73,976
hårrørsvirkning/70,73,7,976
hårbalsam/46,70,976
hælkappe/70,73,7,976
hologram/70,9,976
himmelseng/20,7,70,976
henvendelse/70,73,7,976
hente/6,143,148
handyr/70,252,10,976
gudsdyrkelse/193,70,976
græs/70,9,976,941,947
grafem/70,10,73,976
gin/46,70,976
georgier/20,7,70,976
gemalinde/70,73,7,976
færdigmål/70,252,10,976
fyre/6,143,148
fyr/130,70,976
frivilligprogram/70,9,976
friluftsmuseum/70,976
formynder/20,7,70,976,941,947
formidlingskanal/70,73,7,976
forarbejdningsindustri/70,73,7,976
fokusere/6,143,148
floragram/70,9,976
flokdyr/70,252,10,976
finansiering/70,73,7,976,939,947
figenkaktus/46,70,976
es/70,9,976
egoist/70,73,7,976,941,947
EF-tilhænger/20,7,70,976
EF-beslutning/70,73,7,976
edb-system/70,10,73,976
dvaletid/70,73,7,976
domspraksis/46,70,976
diversificere/6,143,148
dis/70,9,976,941,947
champagnebrus/70,252,10,976
camembertost/20,7,70,976
cad-system/70,10,73,976
børnepublikum/70,9,976
børneorm/20,7,70,976
byrod/70,976
brudebuket/46,70,976
billedlotteri/70,10,73,976
bikse/6,143,148
betonblander/20,7,70,976
belægning/70,73,7,976,939,947
befuldmægtiget/70,1062
bankierfirma/70,10,73,976
attribut/70,9,976
asiet/46,70,976
aprilsnar/130,70,976
anbringelsessted/70,10,73,976
algierer/20,7,70,976
akaciehonning/70,73,7,976
aftægt/193,70,976
afstribe/6,143,148
formelnummer/115,70,85,976,941,947
formelnummer/70,85,10,976,941,947
tegntype/70,73,7,976,941,947
filter/70,84,10,976,941,947
aerogram/70,9,976
wigwam/46,70,976
æble/70,10,73,976,941,947
åndsretning/70,73,7,976
årvågenhed/193,70,976
Anida/55
Chia/55
Genevieve/55
Julitha/55
Majlis/55
Nimi/55
Siham/55
Wini/55
Bogi/55
George/55
Ketil/55
Nima/55
Suheyb/55
finger/115,70,85,976,941,947
Regstrup/55
Blandebjerg/55
Fleng/55
Hogager/55
Kukhuse/55
Nørup/55
Sjørslev/55
Årby/55
